California statutes. Penal Code
The Department of Justice may charge an applicant a fee for each distinguishing number or mark it issues in an amount sufficient to reimburse it for the actual costs associated with assigning a distinguishing number or mark to a firearm pursuant to Sections 29180 and 29182 and for conducting a firearms eligibility check pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 29182. All money received pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Dealers’ Record of Sale Special Account of the General Fund, to be available upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 780, Sec. 6.   (SB 746)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

29184.

The Department of Justice shall maintain and make available upon request information concerning both of the following:

(a) The number of serial numbers issued pursuant to Section 29182.

(b) The number of arrests for violations of Section 29180.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 60, Sec. 4.   (AB 857)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

29185.

(a) No person, other than a state-licensed firearms manufacturer, shall use a computer numerical control (CNC) milling machine or three-dimensional printer to manufacture a
 firearm.

(b) It is unlawful to sell, offer to sell, or transfer a CNC milling machine or three-dimensional printer that has the sole or primary function of manufacturing firearms to any person in this state, other than a state-licensed firearms manufacturer.

(c) It is unlawful for any person in this state other than a state-licensed firearms manufacturer to possess, purchase, or receive a CNC milling machine or three-dimensional printer that has the sole or primary function of manufacturing firearms.

(d) Subdivisions (b) and (c) do not apply to any of the following:

(1) A person who is engaged in the business of selling manufacturing equipment to a
 state-licensed firearms manufacturer, and who possesses a CNC milling machine or three-dimensional printer with the intent to sell or transfer the CNC milling machine or three-dimensional printer to a state licensed firearms manufacturer.

(2) A common carrier licensed under state law, or a motor carrier, air carrier or carrier affiliated with an air carrier through common controlling interest that is subject to Title 49 of the United States Code, or an authorized agent of any such carrier, when acting in the course and scope of duties incident to the receipt, processing, transportation, or delivery of property.

(3) A person who, before June 30, 2022, possessed a CNC milling machine that has the sole or primary function of manufacturing firearms and who, within 90 days after
 that date, does one of the following:

(A) Sells or transfers the machine to a federally licensed firearms manufacturer or importer.

(B) Sells or transfers the machine to a person described in paragraph (1).

(C) Removes the machine from this state.

(D) Relinquished the machine to a law enforcement agency.

(E) Otherwise lawfully terminates possession of the machine.

(4) A person who, before July 1, 2024, possessed a three-dimensional printer that has the sole or primary function of manufacturing firearms and who, within 90 days after that date,
 does one of the following:

(A) Sells or transfers the machine to a state-licensed firearms manufacturer.

(B) Sells or transfers the machine to a person described in paragraph (1).

(C) Removes the machine from this state.

(D) Relinquishes the machine to a law enforcement agency.

(E) Otherwise lawfully terminates possession of the machine.

(e) This section does not apply to any member of the Armed Forces of the United States or the National Guard, while on duty and acting within the scope and course of employment, or any law enforcement
 agency or forensic laboratory.

(f) A violation of this section is punishable as a misdemeanor.

(g) As used in this section, the following terms are defined as
 follows:

(1) “State-licensed firearms manufacturer” has the same meaning as the term “licensee” is defined in Section 29030.

(2) “Three-dimensional printer” means a computer-aided manufacturing device capable of producing a three-dimensional object from a three-dimensional digital model through an additive manufacturing process that involves the layering of two-dimensional cross sections formed of a resin or similar material that are fused together to form a three-dimensional object.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 243, Sec. 4.   (AB 1089)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

29186.

(a) It is unlawful to knowingly or willfully cause another person to engage in the unlawful manufacture of firearms, or to knowingly or willfully aid, abet, promote, or facilitate the unlawful manufacture of firearms.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the “unlawful manufacture of firearms” includes any of the following:

(1) The manufacture of a firearm by a minor, or by a person who is prohibited from owning or possessing firearms under California law.

(2) The manufacture of four or more firearms within the state in the same calendar year
 by an individual who is not licensed to manufacture firearms pursuant to California law, in violation of Section 29010.

(3) The manufacture of any firearm using a three-dimensional printer or computer numerical control (CNC) milling machine by an individual who is not licensed to manufacture firearms pursuant to California law, in violation of Section 29185.

(4) The manufacture of a firearm by a person who is not a federally licensed firearms manufacturer, for the purpose of selling or transferring ownership of that firearm to another person who is not a federally licensed firearms manufacturer, in violation of subdivision (d) of Section 29180.

(5) The manufacture of a firearm for the purpose of selling, loaning,
 or transferring the firearm to another person, with the intent to complete the sale, loan, or transfer without a required background check on the transferee initiated by a licensed firearms dealer, in violation of Section 27520.

(6) The manufacture of any of the following:

(A) Assault weapons or .50 BMG rifles, in violation of Section 30600.

(B) Firearms that are not immediately recognizable as firearms, in violation of Section 24510.

(C) Firearms that are not imprinted with a valid state or federal serial number or mark of identification, in violation of subdivision (f) of Section 29180.

(D) Large-capacity magazines or large-capacity magazine conversion kits, in violation of Section 32310 or 32311.

(E) Machineguns, in violation of Section 32625.

(F) Multiburst trigger activators, in violation of Section 32900.

(G) Short-barreled rifles or short-barreled shotguns, in violation of Section 33215.

(H) Undetectable firearms, in violation of Section 24610.

(I) Unsafe handguns, in violation of Section 32000.

(J) Zip guns, in violation of Section 33600.

(K) Any other
 weapon defined as a “generally prohibited weapon” under Section 16590.

(c) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 636, Sec. 6.   (AB 1263)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 8. MISCELLANEOUS RULES RELATING TO FIREARMS GENERALLY [29300. - 29535.]



  CHAPTER 1. Miscellaneous Provisions [29300. - 29305.]

29300.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), a firearm of any nature owned or possessed in violation of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 29610), Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800), or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9 of this title, or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 8100) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or used in the commission of any misdemeanor as provided in this code, any felony, or an attempt to commit any misdemeanor as provided in this code or any felony, is, upon a conviction of the defendant or upon a juvenile court finding that an offense which would be a misdemeanor or felony if committed by an adult was committed or attempted by the juvenile with the use of a firearm, a nuisance, and is subject
 to Sections 18000 and 18005.

(b) A finding that the defendant was guilty of the offense but was insane at the time the offense was committed is a conviction for the purposes of this section.

(c) A firearm is not a nuisance pursuant to this section if the firearm owner disposes of the firearm pursuant to Section 29810.

(d) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) Any firearm in the possession of the Department of Fish and Game.

(2) Any firearm that was used in the violation of any provision of the Fish and Game Code or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto.

(3) Any firearm that is forfeited pursuant to
 Section 5008.6 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

29305.

(a) The Department of Justice shall collect and report data on arrests made by law enforcement agencies for offenses related to firearms without a valid state or federal serial number. The department shall collect and report the following data:

(1) The number of arrests for violations of Section 23920.

(2) The number of arrests
 for violations of Section 29180.

(3) Until January 1, 2029, the disposition of violations of Sections 23920 and 29180, including, without limitation, the number of cases resulting in each of the following dispositions:

(A) An arrest was made, but the arresting law enforcement agency did not submit charges to the district attorney or other prosecuting agency.

(B) An arrest was made, but no charges were filed by the district attorney or other prosecuting agency.

(C) The case was dismissed after charging, either by the court or the district attorney.

(D) The defendant was acquitted.

(E) The defendant was convicted, whether by trial or by plea.

(4) Commencing on January 1, 2029, the disposition of violations
 of Sections 23920
 and 29180
 based on the information reported to the department pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 13370, including, without limitation, the number of cases resulting in each of the following dispositions:

(A) An arrest was made, but the arresting law enforcement agency did not submit charges to the district attorney or other prosecuting agency.

(B) An arrest was made, but no charges were filed by the district attorney or other prosecuting agency.

(C) The case was dismissed after charging, either by the court or the district attorney.

(D) The defendant was acquitted by trial.

(E) The defendant was convicted by plea.

(F) The defendant was convicted by trial.

(b) Commencing on July 1, 2025, and annually thereafter, the department shall issue a
 report
 that includes the data collected pursuant to subdivision
 (a). This report shall be made available in the same manner as described in subdivision (g) of Section 13010.

(c) This section shall remain in effect until January 1, 2033, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 233, Sec. 1.   (AB 97)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Entertainment Firearms Permit [29500. - 29535.]

29500.

Any person who is at least 21 years of age may apply for an entertainment firearms permit from the Department of Justice. An entertainment firearms permit authorizes the permitholder to possess firearms loaned to the permitholder for use solely as a prop in a motion picture, television, video, theatrical, or other entertainment production or event.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

29505.

(a) Requests for entertainment firearms permits shall be made on application forms prescribed by the Department of Justice that require applicant information, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Complete name.

(2) Residential and mailing address.

(3) Telephone number.

(4) Date of birth.

(5) Place of birth.

(6) Country of citizenship and, if other than United
 States,
 United States Citizenship and Immigration Services-assigned number.

(7) Valid driver’s license number or valid identification card number issued by the California Department of Motor Vehicles.

(8) Social security number.

(9) Signature.

(b) All applications must be submitted with the appropriate fee as specified in Section 29510.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 52.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

29510.

(a) The Department of Justice shall recover the full costs of administering the entertainment firearms permit program by assessing the following application fees:

(1) For the initial application: one hundred four dollars ($104). Of this sum, fifty-six dollars ($56) shall be deposited into the Fingerprint Fee Account, and forty-eight dollars ($48) shall be deposited into the Dealers’ Record of Sale Special Account.

(2) For each annual renewal application: twenty-nine dollars ($29), which shall be deposited into the Dealers’ Record of Sale Special Account.

(b) The department shall annually review
 and shall adjust the fees specified in subdivision (a), if necessary, to fully fund, but not to exceed the actual costs of, the permit program provided for by this chapter, including enforcement of the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 285, Sec. 27.   (AB 1402)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

29515.

(a) Upon receipt of an initial or renewal application submitted as specified in Sections 29505, 29520, and 29525, the department shall examine its records, records the department is authorized to request from the State Department of State Hospitals pursuant to Section 8104 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and records of the National Instant Criminal Background Check System as described in subsection (t) of Section 922 of Title 18 of the United States Code, in order to determine if the applicant is prohibited from possessing or receiving firearms.

(b) The department shall issue an entertainment firearms permit only if the records indicate that the applicant is not prohibited from possessing or receiving firearms
 pursuant to any federal, state, or local law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 58.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

29520.

(a) An initial application for an entertainment firearms permit shall require the submission of fingerprint images and related information in a manner prescribed by the department, for the purpose of obtaining information as to the existence and nature of a record of state or federal level convictions and state or federal level arrests for which the department establishes that the individual was released on bail or on the individual’s own recognizance pending trial as needed to determine whether the applicant may be issued the permit. Requests for federal level criminal offender record information received by the Department of Justice pursuant to this chapter shall be forwarded by the department to the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(b) The Department of Justice shall review the criminal offender record information specified in subdivision (l) of Section 11105 for entertainment firearms permit applicants.

(c) The Department of Justice shall review subsequent arrests, pursuant to Section 11105.2, to determine the continuing validity of the permit as specified in Section 29530 for all entertainment firearms permitholders.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

29525.

Any person who furnishes a fictitious name or address or knowingly furnishes any incorrect information or knowingly omits any information required to be provided on an application for an entertainment firearms permit is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

29530.

(a) An entertainment firearms permit issued by the Department of Justice shall be valid for one year from the date of issuance.

(b) If at any time during that year the permitholder becomes prohibited from possessing or receiving firearms pursuant to any federal, state, or local law, the entertainment firearms permit shall be no longer valid.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

29535.

The implementation of Sections 29500, 29505, 29515, 29520, and 29525, and of subdivision (a) of Section 29510, by the department is exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 9. SPECIAL FIREARM RULES RELATING TO PARTICULAR PERSONS [29610. - 30165.]



  CHAPTER 1. Juvenile [29610. - 29750.]



  ARTICLE 1. Possession of Firearm [29610. - 29615.1.]

29610.

(a) A minor shall not possess a handgun.

(b) A minor shall not possess a semiautomatic centerfire rifle.

(c) Commencing July 1, 2023, a minor shall not possess any firearm.

(d) The provisions of this section are cumulative, and shall not be construed as restricting the application of any other law. However, an act or omission punishable in different ways by different provisions of this code shall not be punished under more than one provision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 250, Sec. 21.   (SB 715)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

29615.

Section 29610 shall not apply if one of the following circumstances exists:

(a) The minor is accompanied by a parent or legal guardian, and the minor is actively engaged in, or is in direct transit to or from, a lawful, recreational sport, including, but not limited to, competitive shooting, or agricultural, ranching, or hunting activity or hunting education, or a motion picture, television, or video production, or entertainment or theatrical event, the nature of which involves this use of a firearm.

(b) The minor is accompanied by a responsible adult, the minor has the prior written consent of a parent or legal guardian, and the minor is actively engaged in, or is in direct transit to or from, a lawful, recreational sport,
 including, but not limited to, competitive shooting, or agricultural, ranching, or hunting activity or hunting education, or a motion picture, television, or video production, or entertainment or theatrical event, the nature of which involves the use of a firearm.

(c) The minor is at least 16 years of age, the minor has the prior written consent of a parent or legal guardian, and the minor is actively engaged in, or is in direct transit to or from, a lawful recreational sport, including, but not limited to, competitive shooting, or agricultural, ranching, or hunting activity or hunting education, or a motion picture, television, or video production, or entertainment or theatrical event, the nature of which involves the use of a firearm.

(d) The minor has the prior written consent of a parent or legal guardian, the minor is on lands owned or lawfully possessed by the parent or
 legal guardian, and the minor is actively engaged in, or is in direct transit to or from, a lawful, recreational sport, including, but not limited to, competitive shooting, or agricultural, ranching, or hunting activity or hunting education, or a motion picture, television, or video production, or entertainment or theatrical event, the nature of which involves the use of a firearm.

(e) The minor possesses, with the express permission of their parent or legal guardian, a firearm, other than a handgun or semiautomatic centerfire rifle, and both of the following are true:

(1) The minor is actively engaged in, or in direct transit to or from, a lawful, recreational sport, including, but not limited to, competitive shooting, or an agricultural, ranching, or hunting activity or hunting education, the nature of which involves the use of a firearm.

(2) The minor is 16 years of age or older or is accompanied by a responsible adult at all times while the minor is possessing the firearm.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 362, Sec. 2.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

29615.1.

(a) Section 29610 shall not apply to a minor if all of the following are met:

(1) The minor is actively engaged in, or is going to or from, any event conducted under the supervision or control of an entity authorized by the International Olympic Committee, International Paralympic Committee, International Shooting Sport Federation, or World Shooting Para Sport.

(2) The minor is accompanied by a responsible adult. The responsible adult shall be one of the following:

(A) A team official who is responsible for the minor’s participation in any event described in paragraph (1).

(B) A member of the minor’s applicable National Olympic Committee or National Paralympic Committee.

(C) A legal representative of the minor.

(3) The minor is a competitor who will participate in any competitive or training event that utilizes firearms and is conducted under the supervision or control of an entity authorized by the International Olympic Committee, the International Paralympic Committee, International Shooting Sport Federation, or World Shooting Para Sport.

(4) The minor has and is able to present an accredited credential issued by the International Olympic Committee, the International Paralympic Committee, International Shooting Sport Federation, or World Shooting Para Sport.

(5) The firearm is for use in a competitive or training event that utilizes firearms and is conducted under the supervision or control of an entity authorized by the International Olympic Committee, the International Paralympic Committee, International Shooting Sport Federation, or World Shooting Para Sport.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2027, and shall become inoperative upon the later of October 1, 2028, or the conclusion of the 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games, and, as of January 1, 2029, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 354, Sec. 3.   (AB 191)   Effective September 20, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   Conditionally inoperative on or after October 1, 2028, as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Possession of Live Ammunition [29650. - 29655.]

29650.

A minor shall not possess live ammunition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

29655.

Section 29650 shall not apply if one of the following circumstances exists:

(a) The minor has the written consent of a parent or legal guardian to possess live ammunition.

(b) The minor is accompanied by a parent or legal guardian.

(c) The minor is actively engaged in, or is going to or from, a lawful, recreational sport, including, but not limited to, competitive shooting, or agricultural, ranching, or hunting activity, the nature of which involves the use of a firearm.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Punishment [29700. - 29705.]

29700.

Every minor who violates this chapter shall be punished as follows:

(a) By imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 or in a county jail if one of the following applies:

(1) The minor has been found guilty previously of violating this chapter.

(2) The minor has been found guilty previously of an offense specified in Section 29905, 32625, or 33410, or an offense specified in any provision listed in Section 16590.

(3) The minor has been found guilty of
 possessing a handgun in violation of Section 29610.

(b) Violations of this chapter other than those violations specified in subdivision (a) shall be punishable as a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 250, Sec. 23.   (SB 715)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

29705.

In a proceeding to enforce this chapter brought pursuant to Article 14 (commencing with Section 601) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the court may require the custodial parent or legal guardian of a minor who violates this chapter to participate in classes on parenting education that meet the requirements established in Section 16507.7 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Legislative Intent [29750. - 29750.]

29750.

(a) In enacting the amendments to former Sections 12078 and 12101 by Section 10 of Chapter 33 of the Statutes of 1994, First Extraordinary Session, it was not the intent of the Legislature to expand or narrow the application of the then-existing statutory and judicial authority as to the rights of minors to be loaned or to possess live ammunition or a firearm for the purpose of self-defense or the defense of others.

(b) In enacting the act that adds this subdivision, it is not the intent of the Legislature to expand or narrow the application of existing statutory and judicial authority as to the rights of minors to be loaned or to possess live ammunition or a firearm for the purpose of
 self-defense or the defense of others.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 250, Sec. 24.   (SB 715)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Person Convicted of Specified Offense, Addicted to Narcotic, or Subject to Court Order [29800. - 29880.]



  ARTICLE 1. Prohibitions on Firearm Access [29800. - 29830.]

29800.

(a) (1) Any person who has been convicted of a felony under the laws of the United States, the State of California, or any other state, government, or country, or of an offense enumerated in subdivision (a), (b), or (d) of Section 23515, or who is addicted to the use of any narcotic drug, and who owns, purchases, receives, or has in possession or under custody or control any firearm is guilty of a felony.

(2) Any person who has two or more convictions for violating paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 417 and who owns, purchases, receives, or has in possession or under custody or control any firearm is guilty of a felony.

(3) Any person who has an outstanding warrant for any offense listed in this subdivision and who has knowledge of the outstanding warrant, and who owns, purchases, receives, or has in possession or under custody or control any firearm is guilty of a felony.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any person who has been convicted of a felony or of an offense enumerated in Section 23515, when that conviction results from certification by the juvenile court for prosecution as an adult in an adult court under Section 707 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and who owns or has in possession or under custody or control any firearm is guilty of a felony.

(c) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to a conviction or warrant for a
 felony under the laws of the United States unless either of the following criteria, as applicable, is satisfied:

(1) Conviction of an offense under California law that includes comparable elements of the federal offense can only result in imposition of felony punishment.

(2) The defendant was sentenced to a federal correctional facility for more than 30 days, or received a fine of more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or received both punishments.

(d) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a conviction for a nonviolent felony under the laws of any other state if both of the following criteria are satisfied:

(1) The conviction has been vacated, set aside, expunged,
 or otherwise dismissed under the laws of the state where the defendant was convicted.

(2) If the conviction resulted in a firearms prohibition under the laws of the state where the defendant was convicted, the vacatur, set aside, expungement, or dismissal of the conviction restored firearms rights under the laws of that state.

(e) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a conviction for a nonviolent felony under the laws of any other state if both of the following criteria are satisfied:

(1) The person received a full and unconditional pardon by the Governor of the other state for the felony conviction and the pardon restores civil rights that include firearms rights.

(2) The person was never convicted of a felony involving the use of a dangerous weapon, as that phrase is used in Sections 4852.17 and 4854.

(f) (1) As used in this section, “nonviolent felony” means an offense under the laws of any other state that does not include
 comparable elements constituting an offense listed in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5, subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7, subdivision (a) of Section 1192.8, Section 23515, or Section 29905.

(2) An attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit an offense under the laws of any other state that includes comparable elements constituting an offense listed in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5, subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7, subdivision (a) of Section 1192.8, Section 23515, or Section 29905 is not a “nonviolent felony,” as used in this section.

(3) Aiding or abetting an offense under the laws of any other state that includes comparable elements constituting an offense listed in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5, subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7, subdivision (a) of
 Section 1192.8, Section 23515, or Section 29905 is not a “nonviolent felony,” as used in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 570, Sec. 19.   (AB 1078)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

29805.

(a) (1) Except as provided in Section 29855, subdivision (a) of Section 29800, or subdivision (b), any person who has been convicted of a misdemeanor violation of Section 71, 76, 136.1, 136.5, or 140, subdivision (d) of Section 148, subdivision (f) of Section 148.5, Section 171b, paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 171c, Section 171d, 186.28, 240, 241, 242, 243, 243.4, 244.5, 245, 245.5, 246.3, 247, 273.5, 273.6, 417, 417.6, 422, 422.6, 626.9, 646.9, 830.95, 17500, 17510, 25300, 25800, 30315, or 32625, subdivision (b) or (d) of Section 26100, or Section 27510, or Section 8100, 8101, or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, any firearm-related offense pursuant to Sections 871.5 and 1001.5 of the Welfare and
 Institutions Code, Section 487 if the property taken was a firearm, or of the conduct
 punished in subdivision (c) of Section 27590, and who, within 10 years of the conviction, owns, purchases, receives, or has in possession or under custody or control, any firearm is guilty of a public offense, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or in the state prison, by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(2) Any person who has an outstanding warrant for any misdemeanor offense described in this subdivision, and who has knowledge of the outstanding warrant, and who owns, purchases, receives, or has in possession or under custody or control any firearm is guilty of a public offense, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or in the state prison, by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both
 that imprisonment and fine.

(b) Any person who is convicted, on or after January 1, 2019, of a misdemeanor violation of Section 273.5, and who subsequently owns, purchases, receives, or has in possession or under custody or control, any firearm is guilty of a public offense, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or in the state prison, by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(c) Any person who is convicted on or after January 1, 2020, of a misdemeanor violation of Section 25100, 25135, or 25200, and who, within 10 years of the conviction,
 owns, purchases, receives, or has in possession or under custody or control, any firearm is guilty of a public offense, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or in the state prison, by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(d) Any person who is convicted on or after January 1, 2023, of a misdemeanor violation of Section 273a, subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 368, or subdivision (e) or (f) of Section 29180, and who, within 10 years of the conviction, owns, purchases, receives, or has in possession or under custody or control, any firearm is guilty of a public
 offense, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or in the state prison, by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(e) Except as provided in Section 29855 or subdivision (a) of Section 29800, any person who is convicted on or after January 1, 2024, of a misdemeanor violation of this section, and who, within 10 years of the conviction, owns, purchases, receives, or has in possession or under custody or control, any firearm is guilty of a public offense, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or in the state prison, by a fine not exceeding one thousand
 dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(f) Any person who is convicted on or after January 1, 2024, of a misdemeanor violation of paragraph (5), (6), or (7) of subdivision (c) of Section 25400, paragraph (5), (6), or (7) of subdivision (c) of Section 25850, subdivision (a) of Section 26350, or subdivision (a) of Section 26400, and who, within 10 years of the conviction, owns, purchases, receives, or has in possession or under custody or control, any firearm is guilty of a public offense, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or in the state prison, by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both
 that fine and imprisonment.

(g) Any person who is convicted on or after January 1, 2025, of a misdemeanor violation of subdivision (a) of Section 597, and who, within 10 years of the conviction, owns, purchases, receives, or has in possession or under custody or control, any firearm is guilty of a public offense, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(h) Any person, who is convicted on or after January 1, 2026, of a misdemeanor violation of Section 24610, 27530, 29185, 29186, 30605, 30610, 32900, 33215, or 33600, and who, within 10 years of the conviction, owns, purchases, receives, or has in their possession or under their custody or control any firearm, is guilty
 of a public offense, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(i) The court, on forms prescribed by the Department of Justice, shall notify the department of persons subject to this section. However, the prohibition in this section may be reduced, eliminated, or conditioned as provided in Section 29855 or 29860.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 636, Sec. 7.   (AB 1263)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Note: This section was amended on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 63.)
-------------------------------------------

29810.

(a) (1) Upon conviction of, or adjudication for, any offense that renders a person subject to Section 29800, 29805, 29815, 29820, or 29825, the person shall relinquish all firearms they own, possess, or have under their custody or control in the manner provided in this section within 48 hours of the conviction or adjudication if the person remains out of custody or within 14 days of the conviction or adjudication if the person is in custody.

(2) The court shall, upon conviction or adjudication of a person for an offense described in subdivision (a), instruct the person that they are prohibited from owning, purchasing, receiving, possessing, or having under their custody or control, any firearms, ammunition, and ammunition
 feeding devices, including, but not limited to, magazines, and shall order the person to relinquish all firearms in the manner provided in this section. The court shall also provide the person with a Prohibited Persons Relinquishment Form developed by the Department of Justice.

(3) Using the Prohibited Persons Relinquishment Form, the person shall name a designee and grant the designee power of attorney for the purpose of transferring or disposing of any firearms. The designee shall be either a local law enforcement agency or a consenting third party who is not prohibited from possessing firearms under state or federal law. The designee shall, within the time periods specified in subdivisions (d) and (e), surrender the firearms to the control of a local law enforcement agency, sell the firearms to a licensed firearms dealer, or transfer the firearms for storage to a firearms dealer pursuant to Section 29830.

(b) The Prohibited Persons Relinquishment Form shall do all of the following:

(1) Inform the person that they are prohibited from owning, purchasing, receiving, possessing, or having under their custody or control, any firearms, ammunition, and, if applicable, ammunition feeding devices, including, but not limited to, magazines, and that they shall relinquish all firearms through a designee within the time periods set forth in subdivision (d) or (e) by surrendering the firearms to the control of a local law enforcement agency, selling the firearms to a licensed firearms dealer, or transferring the firearms for storage to a firearms dealer pursuant to Section 29830.

(2) Inform the person that any cohabitant of the person who owns firearms must store those firearms in accordance with Section 25135.

(3) Require the person to declare any firearms that they owned, possessed, or had under their custody or control at the time of their conviction or adjudication, and require the person to describe the firearms and provide all reasonably available information about the location of the firearms to enable a designee or law enforcement officials to locate the firearms.

(4) Require the person to name a designee, if the person declares that they owned, possessed, or had under their custody or control any firearms at the time of their conviction or adjudication, and grant the designee power of attorney for the purpose of transferring or disposing of all firearms.

(5) Require the designee to indicate their consent to the designation and, except a designee that is a law enforcement agency, to declare under penalty of perjury
 that they are not prohibited from possessing any firearms under state or federal law.
